Idaho, session 2026, H0871.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the State Tax Commission the following
amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and expense
classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30,
2027:
FOR FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
I. GENERAL SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $550,000 $550,000
Multistate Tax Compact
Fund $109,400 109,400
Administration Services for Transportation
Fund 400,000 590,400 990,400
Seminars and Publications
Fund 0 291,600 291,600
TOTAL $950,000 $991,400 $1,941,400
II. COMPLIANCE DIVISION:
FROM:
General
Fund $353,000 $353,000


FOR FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
III. PROPERTY TAX:
FROM:
Seminars and Publications
Fund $50,000 $50,000
GRAND TOTAL $353,000 $1,000,000 $991,400 $2,344,400
SECTION 2. USE OF APPROPRIATIONS. Of the moneys appropriated from the
General Fund in section 1 of this bill, $550,000 may only be used for FAST Tax
Collection vendor payments. Any portion of this appropriation not utilized
for this purpose shall revert to the General Fund and be reported to Legisla-
tive Services Office.
SECTION 3. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 4. In addition to the appropriation made in Section 1, Chap-
ter 338, Laws of 2025, and any other appropriation provided by law, there is
hereby appropriated to the State Tax Commission the following amounts to be
expended according to the designated programs for personnel costs from the
General Fund for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
TO:
Compliance Division $210,300
General Services 555,000
TOTAL $765,300
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Section 4 of this act shall be in full force and effect on
and after passage and approval, and Sections 1, 2, and 3 of this act shall be
in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2026.